Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.080

Claims of auditor.

All claims of the county auditor against the county for services shall be audited and allowed by the board of county commissioners as other claims are audited and allowed. Such warrants shall in all respects be audited, approved, issued, numbered, registered, and paid the same as any other county warrant.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.22.080. Prior: 1893 c 119 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 2710, part; 1869 p 310 s 5, part; 1863 p 549 s 5, part; 1854 p 425 s 5, part; RRS s 4086, part.]